Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 5
COLORADO REVISED STATUTES

Law reviews:

For article, "The

C

olorado Revised Statutes: A Glimpse at the State's Obligation - Past, Present, and Future", see 26

C

olo. Law. 97 (June 1997); for article, "Understanding Colorado Statutory Source Notes", see 42 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2013); for article, "Researching Legislative History", see 44 Colo. Law. 33 (March 2015).

Section

2-5-101. Compilation of Colorado Revised Statutes.

The revisor of statutes, referred to in this article as the "revisor", under the supervision and direction of the committee on legal services, referred to in this article as the "committee", shall compile, edit, arrange, and prepare for publication all laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature.

The statutes shall be arranged and collated into such code titles, articles, and sections, and under such a numbering system as the committee approves and directs. The committee shall designate the number of volumes to comprise a set of the statutes for purposes of this arrangement and collating.

The compilation of statutory laws and nonstatutory material provided for in this article, originally entitled "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973" and cited as "C.R.S. 1973", shall, on and after July 1, 1983, be entitled "Colorado Revised Statutes" and may be cited as "C.R.S.". Reference to individual sections of the statutes shall be cited substantially in the following manner: "Section 1-1-101, C.R.S.". Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 or to C.R.S. 1973 shall be deemed to refer to Colorado Revised Statutes or to C.R.S.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 364, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-1.

L. 83:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 377, § 2, effective July 1.

2-5-102. Inclusions - nonstatutory.

At the end of each section of the statutes, the revisor shall include:

Reference to the statutory history of the section;

Annotations of state and federal court decisions construing, applying, or relating to the subject matter of the section; and

Such editorial notes, cross references, and other matter as the committee considers desirable or advantageous.

The revisor shall prepare for publication with Colorado Revised Statutes:

The declaration of independence;

The constitutions of the United States and state of Colorado;

The enabling act admitting Colorado into the union; and

The rules of civil and criminal procedure and such other rules as the supreme court of Colorado may adopt.

The revisor shall also prepare for publication with Colorado Revised Statutes a complete subject index and comparative disposition tables or cross reference indices relating sections of the original 1973 compilation to prior compilations and session laws.

The revisor of statutes shall include in the publication of the "Uniform Commercial Code", as nonstatutory matter, a complete index to the code and, following each section of the code, the session law source of that section and a specific designation of differences in text, if any, between that section and the version of that section in the official text of the "Uniform Commercial Code" issued by the American law institute and the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws upon which that article of the "Uniform Commercial Code" as enacted in Colorado was based. In addition, the revisor of statutes shall include after each section the full text of the official comment to that section in that version of the article in the official text in effect at the time of the enactment of that version of that article in Colorado, and by the Colorado comments of the revisor of statutes. The inclusion of said nonstatutory matter is only for the purpose of information, and no inference or presumption of legislative intent shall be drawn therefrom.

In order that said "Uniform Commercial Code" shall be, at all times and in all respects, as uniform as possible with the "Uniform Commercial Code" of other states, the order and arrangement of articles, sections, and subsections of said code, the numbering and lettering system of said articles, sections, and subsections, the titles or headings of said articles, sections, or subsections, and the wording, punctuation, capitalization, and sentence and paragraph structure of said code and any amendments thereto, as enacted by the general assembly, shall be preserved and maintained as far as possible without change; except that the revisor of statutes and the committee on legal services shall review said code and revise the same for the correction of errors needed and present said code, with the correction of such errors, to the general assembly for reenactment with other statutes of a general and permanent nature.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Colorado Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1981", as nonstatutory matter, following each section of the article, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the official volume containing the 1976 official text of the "Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments or Colorado comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the uniform act. The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Colorado Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act", as nonstatutory matter, following each section of the article, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the official volume containing the 1984 official text of the "Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments or Colorado comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the uniform act. The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

There may be included in the publication of the amendments to article 10 of title 15, Colorado Revised Statutes, and to the revised parts 1 through 9 of article 11 of title 15, Colorado Revised Statutes, as nonstatutory matter, following each section of articles 10 and 11 of title 15, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the official volume containing the official text of the "Uniform Probate Code - Article II" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments or Colorado comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the uniform act. The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Colorado Water for the 21st Century Act", as nonstatutory matter, following section 37-75-105, C.R.S., the full text of the interbasin compact charter as submitted to the general assembly on April 6, 2006, by the interbasin compact committee.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Uniform Power of Attorney Act", as nonstatutory matter, following each section of the act, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the official volume containing the 2006 official text of the "Uniform Power of Attorney Act" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments or Colorado comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the uniform act. The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Colorado Probate Code" as nonstatutory matter, following each amended or added section, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the 2008 official text of "Amendments to Uniform Probate Code" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the "Uniform Probate Code". The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

There shall be included in the publication of the "Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act" as nonstatutory matter, following each amended or added section, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the 2011 official text of the "Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the "Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act". The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

The revisor of statutes shall include in the publication of the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act" as nonstatutory matter, following each amended or added section, the full text of the official comments to that section contained in the 2008 official text of the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act" issued by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, with any changes in the official comments to correspond to Colorado changes in the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act". The comments shall be prepared by the revisor of statutes and approved for publication by the committee on legal services.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 364, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-2.

L. 74:

(4) and (5) added, p. 420, § 71, effective April 11.

L. 77:

(4) amended, p. 311, § 1, effective January 1.

L. 81:

(6) added, p. 453, § 4, effective November 1.

L. 83:

IP(2) and (3) amended, p. 378, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(7) added, p. 1690, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(8) added, p. 1039, § 15, effective July 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

(9) added, p. 1282, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2009:

(10) added, (HB 09-1198), ch. 106, p. 424, § 12, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(11) added, (SB 10-199), ch. 374, p. 1747, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(12) added, (HB 12-1209), ch. 138, p. 504, § 2, effective August 8; (4) amended, (HB 12-1262), ch. 170, p. 609, § 17, effective July 1, 2013.

L. 2015:

(13) added, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 568, § 34, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Commercial Code", see title 4; for the "Colorado Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1981", see article 62 of title 7; for the "Colorado Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act", see article 8 of title 38; for the "Uniform Power of Attorney Act", see part 7 of article 14 of title 15; for the "Colorado Probate Code", see articles 10 to 17 of title 15; for the "Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act", see article 71.5 of title 24; for the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", see article 5 of title 14.

2-5-103. Preparation of Colorado Revised Statutes.

In compiling, editing, arranging, and preparing the statutes, the revisor, under the supervision and direction of the committee, shall:

Adopt a uniform system of punctuation, capitalization, and wording;

Eliminate all obsolete and redundant wording of laws;

Correct obvious errors and inconsistencies;

Correct inaccurate references to the titles of officers, departments, or other agencies of the state and to other statutes, and make such other name changes as are necessary to be consistent with the law currently in effect;

Eliminate any duplications in law and any laws repealed directly or by implication; and

Clarify existing laws, modernize terminology, and make such other nonsubstantive changes as the committee considers proper.

The revisor shall make no change in the substance of any statute but may make such changes in arrangement and terminology as will, in the judgment of the committee, improve the style and clarity of the laws, yet preserve the intent, effect, and meaning of each statutory provision.

The revisor, with the approval of the committee, may employ such additional professional and clerical staff, within limits of appropriations, as may be necessary for the preparation and publication of the statutes under this article. In addition, the committee may obtain, by contract, such technical and professional assistance as it deems advisable for the efficient and accurate preparation and publication of such statutes, including but not limited to preparation of annotations and indices.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 365, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-3.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1345, § 2, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For editorial work in the office of revisor of statutes, see § 2-3-703; for legislative construction not based on editorial matters, see § 2-5-113 (4).

2-5-104. Revisor's bill.

The revisor, under the supervision and direction of the committee, shall prepare and submit annually one or more bills containing amendments or repeals of obsolete, inoperative, imperfect, obscure, or doubtful laws as the revisor considers necessary to improve the clarity and certainty of the statutes as provided in section 2-5-103.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 365, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-4.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 265, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2965, § 9, effective August 10.

2-5-105. Publication contract - legislative declaration.

Consistent with the requirement of section 8 of article XVIII of the state constitution that the general assembly provide for the publication of the laws passed at each session, the state acknowledges its obligation to provide official sets of statutes that are reasonably priced, accurate, and easy to use. In fulfillment of this obligation, the general assembly provides for distribution of statutes to state and local government agencies and the courts, without charge, in accordance with section 2-5-116 and provides for sale of statutes to the public in accordance with sections 2-5-111 and 2-5-118.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

This section is enacted to assure that the obligation set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is met consistent with the requirements of section 29 of article V of the state constitution governing the printing, binding, and distribution of the laws;

An official, softbound, fully annotated set of statutes that is republished in its entirety annually and that is prepared under the supervision and direction of the committee on legal services of the general assembly meets that obligation; and

On and after January 1, 1997, annual, softbound, official statutes shall be printed as a continuation of the original enactment of the Colorado Revised Statutes printed in accordance with the provisions of this article.

On and after January 1, 1997, the work of the printing, binding, and packaging of softbound volumes and publications ancillary to Colorado Revised Statutes, originally entitled Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and other similar operations precedent to the distribution thereof when published shall be performed pursuant to a contract or contracts bid and entered into in the manner directed by the committee on legal services in accordance with this section. Such contract or contracts shall be bid by employing standard bidding practices including, but not limited to, the use of requests for information, requests for proposals, or any other standard vendor selection practices determined by the committee to be best suited to selecting an appropriate printing contractor. The executive director of the department of personnel shall provide such technical advice and assistance regarding bidding procedures as deemed necessary by the committee.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the work of printing, binding, and packaging of softbound volumes and publications ancillary to Colorado Revised Statutes be submitted to bid and any contract or contracts be awarded by the committee on legal services at least one year prior to the expiration of the current printing contract on December 31, 1997. However, if the committee determines that a further extension of the current contract would facilitate preparation of Colorado Revised Statutes in a new format and that such an extension would be in the public interest, the committee may extend such contract for an additional period not to exceed five years. The committee shall determine whether such an extension should be granted and, subject to the five-year limitation, the duration of any extension. Subsequent contracts for the work of printing, binding, packaging, and distribution shall be rebid at the direction of the committee on legal services prior to the expiration of a contract or, if an extension is granted, prior to the expiration of the extension period. Subsequent contracts shall be awarded at least six months prior to the expiration of a prior contract or extension period. The committee shall assure that the work is rebid at least every ten years. Such contract or contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders and the determination thereof by the committee shall be final.

The terms and conditions of any contract shall be determined by the committee on legal services, subject to the following:

The term of any contract shall not exceed five years; however, the committee on legal services may extend the term of any such contract for one additional period of not more than five years if it finds that such an extension would be in the public interest; and

Any contract shall contain adequate procedures to allow for verification of actual costs of printing.

The methods and terms of sale of Colorado Revised Statutes to the public shall be included in the contract as an alternative provision as provided for in section 2-5-111.

The committee on legal services may authorize such enhancements to or improvements in Colorado Revised Statutes as the committee deems appropriate.

In the award of said contract or contracts, the committee on legal services shall take into consideration the policies set forth in the "Unfair Practices Act", article 2 of title 6, C.R.S.

In determining the lowest responsible bidder in the award of said contract or contracts or in determining whether to extend any such contract as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the committee on legal services shall take into consideration the economic, fiscal, and tax impacts of the award or extension on the state of Colorado, its citizens, and its businesses. The information must be provided in writing and shall be verifiable by legal services staff.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 548, § 1, effective April 29, 1993.)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 366, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-5.

L. 71:

p. 1241, § 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1290, § 10, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 378, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1902, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 548, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 96:

Entire section amended and (2) amended, pp. 1345, 1512, §§ 3, 36, effective June 1.

2-5-105.5. Publication - paper specification.

A contract or extension of contract entered into after May 25, 2017, to publish or print the Colorado Revised Statutes pursuant to section 2-5-105 must specify that the paper used must meet the alkaline reserve minimum requirements and acidity levels for uncoated paper established by the American national standards institute and the national information standards organization (ANSI/NISO Z39.48-1992 (R2009)).

This provision does not affect any contract that is in effect on January 1, 2017.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1260, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-293), ch. 257, p. 1075, § 1, effective May 25.

2-5-106. Bid and contract forms, guarantee, bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 366, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-6.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1290, § 11, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-107. Notification of bidders. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 366, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-7.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1290, § 12, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-108. Contents of forms. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-8.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-109. Contract approval and execution.

Any publication contract entered into pursuant to section 2-5-105 and all proceedings included therein shall be approved by the attorney general as to legality and by the controller, acting as the designee of the governor, and executed by the chairman of the committee for and in behalf of the state.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-9.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1290, § 13, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 378, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1904, § 2, effective May 24.

2-5-110. Cost, alternative specifications. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-10.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-111. Sale price to public.

The methods and terms of sale of Colorado Revised Statutes, and ancillary publications thereto, to the public shall be included by the committee as an alternative specification and bid, and as a part of a contract let by bids authorized by this article.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-11.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 378, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1904, § 3, effective

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1347, § 4, effective June 1.

2-5-112. Report to the 1974 session of the general assembly. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-12.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-113. Effect of enactment of Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 - legislative construction not based on editorial matters.

Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 was enacted as a repeal and reenactment of Colorado Revised Statutes 1963 and the supplements thereto, as provided for in section 2-5-122, as said section existed upon its repeal.

The effect of the enactment of the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, as of its effective and operative date, shall be:

To repeal all statutes and parts of statutes of a general and permanent nature not contained in the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973;

To revive no law repealed or superseded before the effective and operative date of the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973;

To affect no act done, right accrued, or obligation incurred or imposed by law prior to that effective and operative date;

Neither to abate nor otherwise affect any action, suit, or proceeding pending on such effective and operative date;

To affect no penalty or forfeiture incurred before such effective and operative date, except that where a punishment, penalty, or forfeiture is mitigated by any provision of the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, that mitigating provision shall apply to any judgment pronounced after that effective and operative date; and

To have no effect on the running or ending of a limitation or period of time prescribed for acquiring a right, barring a remedy, or for any other purpose, where the time limitation began to run before that effective and operative date and the same or a similar limitation is prescribed in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

The provisions of Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, insofar as they are the same in substantial intent, effect, and meaning as those of prior laws, shall be given effect as though a continuation of those laws and not as new enactments. If, however, any act set out in the prior laws and reenacted by Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 or any supplement thereto is alleged to have had a defective title when originally enacted, that defect is cured by enactment of the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 or any supplement thereto.

The classification and arrangement by title, article, and numbering system of sections of Colorado Revised Statutes, as well as the section headings, source notes, annotations, revisor's notes, and other editorial material, shall be construed to form no part of the legislative text but to be only for the purpose of convenience, orderly arrangement, and information; therefore, no implication or presumption of a legislative construction is to be drawn therefrom.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 367, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-13.

L. 83:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 378, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 276, § 1, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For editorial work by the revisor of statutes, see § 2-3-703; for preparation of Colorado Revised Statutes, see § 2-5-103.

2-5-114. Deposit with secretary of state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 70:

p. 368, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-14.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 382, § 17, effective July 1.

2-5-115. Copyright by state.

Colorado Revised Statutes and ancillary publications thereto, as published, shall be the sole property of the state of Colorado as owner and publisher thereof. The committee, or its designee, may register a copyright for and in behalf of the state of Colorado in any and all original publications and editorial work ancillary to the Colorado Revised Statutes that are prepared by the general assembly or its staff. The committee shall use its best efforts to ensure that any federal copyright registered pursuant to this section is appropriately maintained. Any prior actions of the committee and the revisor in securing such federal copyright are hereby validated.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 369, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-15.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 379, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 335, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1347, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-261), ch. 205, p. 874, § 1, effective May 23.

2-5-116. Official list - designation and disposition of statutes.

The revisor shall prepare for approval by the committee an official list of the state, district, county, and municipal officials and state boards, commissions, divisions, and agencies who shall receive for official use sets of Colorado Revised Statutes, including a sufficient number of volumes for exchange with other states and territories on a reciprocal basis.

The office of legislative legal services shall distribute such sets to the officials and agencies so listed, taking a receipt for each set so delivered.

All sets of volumes provided for official use shall remain the property of the state of Colorado for the use of the named officials and their successors, and shall bear such designation.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 369, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-16.

L. 75:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 850, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 379, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 309, § 14, effective May 23.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1348, § 6, effective June 1.

2-5-117. Softbound volumes - ancillary publications.

Following the regular legislative session convening after January 1, 1997, the revisor, under the supervision and direction of the committee, shall annotate, arrange, and prepare for publication all laws of a general and permanent nature enacted at that session and at any special session intervening since the last preceding regular legislative session. Such laws shall be combined with the laws previously contained in the original hardbound volumes or replacement volumes and with the laws contained in the 1996 cumulative supplements for those volumes. Such combined laws shall be republished in accordance with this article in a fully annotated, softbound set of statutes.

After each regular legislative session convening after January 1, 1998, the preparation for publication shall be as a republication of the entire set of statutes in softbound format that combines newly enacted laws with those published in the preceding year.

Such softbound volumes, when, in like manner as is provided for enactment of Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, certified and reported to the general assembly by the committee, approved and enacted by the general assembly, published, and deposited with the secretary of state, shall be received, recognized, and referred to in like manner as Colorado Revised Statutes. Each year's set of softbound volumes shall become effective on the date specified in section 2-5-126 (2).

The committee may issue such ancillary publications as it considers necessary or desirable in aid of the general use and purposes of Colorado Revised Statutes.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 369, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-17.

L. 79:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 305, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 348, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 83:

(2) to (4) amended, p. 379, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1344, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (SB 11-261), ch. 205, p. 874, § 2, effective May 23.

2-5-118. Official statutes - publications by other persons or agencies.

The statutes prepared in accordance with sections 2-5-102 and 2-5-103 and printed and enacted as the law of the state in accordance with sections 2-5-105, 2-5-113, 2-5-117, and 2-5-126 shall be considered to be the official statutes of the state of Colorado. Such official statutes shall be the only publication of the statutes entitled to be considered as evidence in Colorado courts in accordance with section 13-25-101, C.R.S., and with applicable Colorado court rules. The courts of this state shall take judicial notice of such official statutes.

To ensure public access to the statutes, the committee:

Shall authorize the printing of the official statutes in softbound sets in accordance with section 2-5-105;

May authorize and work cooperatively with the person printing the official statutes in accordance with section 2-5-105 to reprint and distribute the statutes in alternative printed and electronic formats, including, but not limited to the following:

Compact discs;

Online public access through the world wide web;

Electronic applications for handheld electronic devices;

Electronic books or digital versions of books readable on personal computers, mobile handheld electronic devices, or special e-reader or tablet-style devices; and

Other electronic products or formats;

May, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, provide the statutory database containing the official text of the statutes, with or without original ancillary publications prepared by the general assembly or its staff, for the additional publication, reprinting, and distribution of the statutes in print, electronic, or other digital format by another person, agency, or political subdivision, in accordance with subsections (2) to (5) of this section; and

Recognizes that other persons, agencies, or political subdivisions may, from time to time, also publish, reprint, or otherwise distribute the statutes in print, electronic, or other digital format without the use of the statutory database containing the official text of the statutes as prepared by the general assembly or its staff.

Publication, reprinting, or distribution of any of the publications ancillary to the statutes of the state of Colorado, as prepared by the general assembly or its staff, other than pursuant to sections 2-5-101 to 2-5-116, may be made only as provided for in this section.

Any person, agency, or political subdivision desiring to publish, reprint, or distribute, whether by use of printed matter or by use of computer or other electronic means, the statutes of the state of Colorado using the statutory database prepared by the general assembly or its staff containing the official text of the statutes, shall submit to the committee or the committee's designee:

A statement specifying those portions of the statutes the person, agency, or political subdivision seeks to publish;

A statement specifying whether the person, agency, or political subdivision is seeking to publish, reprint, or distribute any of the publications ancillary to the statutes as prepared by the general assembly or its staff pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section;

The costs and fees required by the committee as specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2); and

Such other information as the committee reasonably requires.

Any person, agency, or political subdivision who wishes to publish, reprint, or distribute an officially sanctioned version of the statutes pursuant to this subsection (2) shall reproduce the statutes and ancillary publications, if any, accurately.

In addition to any other requirement, the committee may require that any person, agency, or political subdivision seeking to publish, reprint, or distribute the statutes using the statutory database prepared by the general assembly or its staff containing the official text of the statutes pay a fee to the state and any direct costs of preparation of any material provided by the state. Such fee and costs shall be determined by the committee, and any fee shall be in an amount that the committee determines is necessary to pay for state property interests in the statutes, to pay for the use of any material copyrighted by the state, and to pay for expenses incurred by the committee to ensure the accuracy of the statutes.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 959, § 1, effective April 29, 1992.)

(2.5) (a) Any person, agency, or political subdivision desiring to publish, reprint, or distribute, whether by use of printed matter or by use of computer or other electronic means, any of the publications ancillary to the statutes of the state of Colorado shall make prior written application to the committee, in which the applicant:

Specifies what ancillary publications it seeks to publish;

States generally the purpose for the publication, reprinting, or distribution and the persons or classes of persons to receive copies thereof;

Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the committee that such ancillary publications will be accurately reproduced; and

Agrees to pay the costs and fees required by the committee.

If the committee finds from the application that such distribution meets the requirements of this subsection (2.5) and that it will not be detrimental to the interests of the citizens of the state, it may authorize distribution of such ancillary publications specified in the application. Upon satisfactory arrangements for the payment by such person, agency, or political subdivision of any costs and fees, the committee may provide copies of such ancillary publications in printed or electronic format.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-261), ch. 205, p. 875, § 3, effective May 23, 2011.)

The committee may enter into such contracts as it deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Any contracts entered into prior to May 23, 2011, are hereby validated.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that this section and the other provisions of this article are enacted in furtherance of the general assembly's legislative duty to provide for the publication of the laws as required by section 8 of article XVIII of the state constitution and that any acts of the committee or its staff in implementing these provisions are legislative in character. The purpose of this section is to ensure that the official statutes are made available to the courts, state and local government agencies, and other users; that copies of the Colorado Revised Statutes, when published, reprinted, or distributed to interested citizens, accurately state the law in effect when those copies are prepared; and that unofficial publications, reprintings, or distributions of the statutes are not mistaken for the official statutes produced and enacted in accordance with this article. Any person, agency, or political subdivision that publishes, reprints, or otherwise distributes the statutes of the state of Colorado, with or without any ancillary publications to the statutes, shall reproduce them accurately.

Any publication, reprinting, or distribution that is published in accordance with paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section using the statutory database containing the official text of the statutes may contain a notice, approved by the committee, that indicates that it is an officially sanctioned publication using the official text of the Colorado Revised Statutes. Except for the official statutes provided for in subsection (1) of this section, publications of the statutes shall not contain any notice or other indication that they are official statutes of this state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-261), ch. 205, p. 875, § 3, effective May 23, 2011.)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a person, agency, or political subdivision may publish, reprint, or distribute two hundred or fewer sections of the Colorado Revised Statutes, with or without the ancillary publications thereto, for educational purposes.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 369, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-18.

L. 83:

(1), IP(2), (2)(d), (3), and (4) amended and (2)(b) repealed, pp. 380, 382, §§ 11, 17, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 335, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 92:

(2)(c) amended, p. 959, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1626, § 16, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 1348, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(b)(II), (1)(c), IP(2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c)(I), (3)(a), (4), and (5) amended and (6) added, p. 830, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-261), ch. 205, p. 875, § 3, effective May 23.

2-5-119. Tax levy on civil actions.

A tax of one dollar is imposed upon each action filed in the office of each clerk of a court of record of the state of Colorado, except criminal actions, cases filed for reviews of findings and orders of the industrial claim appeals office, petitions relating to the distribution of estates under sections 15-12-1203 and 15-12-1204, petitions relating to a person with a mental health disorder filed under articles 10.5, 65, and 92 of title 27, cases filed by the state of Colorado, cases filed by the United States of America or any of its agencies in any matter under articles 10 to 20 of title 15, and cases where a party is allowed to sue as a poor person. The party filing the action shall pay the tax to the clerk at the time of such filing. Each clerk shall keep the taxes received in a separate fund and remit them to the state treasurer on the first day of each month for the purpose of reimbursing the general fund for appropriations made for the use of the committee on legal services for statutory revision purposes.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 370, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-19.

L. 73:

p. 1651, § 20.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 380, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 496, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1394, § 30, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 941, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1262, § 31, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

2-5-120. Editorial matters not construed. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1417, § 99.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-6-20.

L. 76:

Entire section repealed, p. 297, § 9, effective May 20.